Maine, session 132, LD1125.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3197 is enacted to read:
§3197. Nonemergency transportation contracts; impact on community action agency
programs
Before entering into a contract with an entity to provide nonemergency transportation
services that are covered by the MaineCare program, the department shall consider the
financial impact that such a contract would have on programs provided by an entity
designated as a community action agency pursuant to section 5324, subsection 1.